Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2040YH (1) 91 je/js H.F. 349 Section 1. Section 91D.1, subsection 1, paragraphs a and b, 1 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. The state hourly wage shall be at least $6.20 as of April 3 1, 2007, and $7.25 as of January 1, 2008 , and $13.50 as of July 4 1, 2025 . 5 b. Every employer, as defined in the federal Fair Labor 6 Standards Act of 1938, as amended to January 1, 2007 July 1, 7 2025 , shall pay to each of the employerâs employees, as defined 8 in the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended to 9 January 1, 2007 July 1, 2025 , the state hourly wage stated in 10 paragraph âaâ , or the current federal minimum wage, pursuant to 11 29 U.S.C. Â§206, as amended, whichever is greater. 12 Sec. 2. Section 91D.1, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 2025, 13 is amended by striking the paragraph. 14